Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201879-4,126
School district in learning community; plan of reorganization; submitted to state committee; approved plan; procedure.

(1) The school board of any school district in a learning community may propose a plan of reorganization. When at least sixty percent of the members of the school board of each affected school district vote to approve the plan, such plan may be submitted to the state committee. When any area is added or removed from any school district in a learning community as part of a plan, such school district shall be deemed an affected school district.

(2) When a plan of reorganization or any part thereof has been approved by the state committee pursuant to the Learning Community Reorganization Act, it shall be designated as the final approved plan and shall be submitted to the county clerk pursuant to section 79-4,128 and to school boards of the affected school districts.

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 37;

Laws 2007, LB641, § 7;

Laws 2016, LB1067, § 26.